Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201079-248
Pupils; health inspections; notice
of defects; contagious or infectious disease; duty of school district.

Every school district shall cause children under
its jurisdiction to be separately and carefully inspected, except as otherwise
provided in this section, to ascertain if a child is suffering from
(1) defective sight or hearing, (2) dental defects, or (3) other conditions
as prescribed by the Department of Health and Human Services. Such inspections shall be conducted on a schedule prescribed
by the department and shall be based on current medical and public health
practice. If such inspection determines that any child has such
condition, the school shall notify the parent of the child in writing of such
condition and explain to such parent the necessity of professional attendance
for such child. Whenever a child apparently shows symptoms of any contagious
or infectious disease, such child shall be sent home immediately or as soon
as safe and proper conveyance can be found and the proper school authority,
school board, or board of education shall be at once notified. Such student
may be excluded from school as provided in section 79-264. A child shall not be required to submit
to an inspection required by this section if his or her parent or guardian
provides school authorities with a statement signed by a physician, a physician
assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse practicing under and in
accordance with his or her respective credentialing act or other qualified
provider as identified by the department in rules and regulations adopted
pursuant to section 79-249, stating that such child has undergone such required
inspection within the past six months. A child shall submit to any required
inspection for which such a statement is not received.

Laws 1919, c. 241, § 1, p. 1004;

C.S.1922, § 6536;

Laws 1923, c. 55, § 1, p. 176;

C.S.1929, § 79-2113;

R.S.1943, § 79-2122;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 171, p. 748;

Laws 1967, c. 538, § 1, p. 1778;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,133;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 52;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 815;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 710;

Laws 2010, LB713, § 1.

Immunization requirements, see sections 79-217 to 79-223.